hi_android/foma/magyar2.foma
# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup      "^"        -> 0;
define CleanupEndings  "^" "+" {cRep}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cImp}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {ccInf11}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {ccInf12}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {ccInf13}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {ccInf21}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {ccInf22}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {ccInf23}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cInf}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cAdv}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {ccAdvan}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cNrep}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPot}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIndefSgp12}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIndefSg1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIndefSg2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIndefSg3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIndefPl1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIndefPl2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIndefPl3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cDefSg1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cDefSg2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cDefSg3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cDefPl1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cDefPl2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cDefPl3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPIndefSg1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPIndefSg2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPIndefSg3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPIndefPl1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPIndefPl2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPIndefPl3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPDefSgp12}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPDefSg1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPDefSg2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPDefSg3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPDefPl1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPDefPl2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPDefPl3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCIndefSg1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCIndefSg2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCIndefSg3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCIndefPl1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCIndefPl2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCIndefPl3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCDefSgp12}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCDefSg1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCDefSg2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCDefSg3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCDefPl1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCDefPl2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCDefPl3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjIndefSg1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjIndefSg2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjIndefSg3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjIndefPl1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjIndefPl2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjIndefPl3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjDefSgp12}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjDefSg1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjDefSg2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjDefSg3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjDefPl1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjDefPl2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjDefPl3}  -> 0 ,,
#enhumisc.foma part for cleanupendigns begins here
                       "^" "+" {cDis}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cEss}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cSoc}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cTem}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPosss1p}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPosss2p}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPosss3p}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPossp1p}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPossp2p}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPossp3p}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPosss1s}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPosss2s}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPosss3s}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPossp1s}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPossp2s}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPossp3s}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPlur}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cFam}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cGenpl} -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cGens}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cAbl}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cAcc}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cAde}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cAll}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCau}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cDat}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cDel}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cEla}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cFac}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cFor}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIll}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIne}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIns}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cNom}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cSub}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cSup}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cTer}  -> 0 ,,
#enhumisc.foma part for cleanupendigns ends here
#enhu2.foma part for cleanupendigns begins here
                       "^" "+" {cnAcc}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {ccForp}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cxForpen}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cSue}  -> 0;
#enhu2.foma part for cleanupendigns begins here
                      
echo ">>> read in magyar.lexc <<<"       
read lexc magyar.lexc
substitute defined PotentialWord for "[Guess]"
define Lexicon

define Grammar  Filter1               .o. 
                Lexicon               .o.                
                CleanupEndings        .o.
                Etoee                 .o. 
                Atoaa                 .o. 
                EetoeAcc              .o. # é
                IitoiAcc3             .o. # í
                UeuetoueAcc3          .o. # ű
                AatoaAcc3             .o. # á
                UutouAcc3             .o. # ú
                HarmRuleAcc           .o. 
                HarmRuleAcc1          .o. 
                Cleanup               .o.
                ToUpCase ;         

regex Grammar;
